Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 7 Organized Crime Prevention Council

35-7-1 through 35-7-5.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1980, p. 396, §§ 1 — 5; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 35; repealed by Ga. L. 2004, p. 988, § 2, effective May 17, 2004.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 988, § 2 repealed and reserved this chapter, effective May 17, 2004.